Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB438.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 25, 1945 (P.L.1050, No.394), known as the Local Tax Collection Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 6.1. Removal of Deceased Spouse.--A taxpayer may request to remove the name of a deceased spouse from a real estate tax bill after presenting a written request and death certificate to the tax collector and the county assessment office.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516171819